SpellChecker/bash.aff
FLAG long
SFX Y84 Y 165 # V15 neg
SFX Y84 0 со .	+Clt/сы
SFX Y84 0 том .
SFX Y84 0 тоң .
SFX Y84 0 то .
SFX Y84 0 тоҡ .
SFX Y84 0 тоғоҙ .
SFX Y84 0 толар .
SFX Y84 0 ҡанмын .
SFX Y84 0 ҡанһың .
SFX Y84 0 ҡан .
SFX Y84 0 ҡанбыҙ .
SFX Y84 0 ҡанһығыҙ .
SFX Y84 0 ҡандар .
SFX Y84 0 ҡайным .
SFX Y84 0 ҡайның .
SFX Y84 0 ҡайны .
SFX Y84 0 ҡайныҡ .
SFX Y84 0 ҡайнығыҙ .
SFX Y84 0 ҡайнылар .
SFX Y84 0 ам .
SFX Y84 0 амын .
SFX Y84 0 аһың .
SFX Y84 0 а .
SFX Y84 0 абыҙ .
SFX Y84 0 аһығыҙ .
SFX Y84 0 алар .
SFX Y84 0 асаҡмын .
SFX Y84 0 асаҡһың .
SFX Y84 0 асаҡ .
SFX Y84 0 асаҡбыҙ .
SFX Y84 0 асаҡһығыҙ .
SFX Y84 0 асаҡтар .
SFX Y84 0 һон .
SFX Y84 0 оғоҙ .
SFX Y84 0 һондар .
SFX Y84 0 айым .
SFX Y84 0 айыҡ .
SFX Y84 0 һам .
SFX Y84 0 һаң .
SFX Y84 0 һа .
SFX Y84 0 һаҡ .
SFX Y84 0 һағыҙ .
SFX Y84 0 һалар .
SFX Y84 0 ҡас .
SFX Y84 0 ҡанса .
SFX Y84 0 оусы .
SFX Y84 0 оу .
SFX Y84 0 томмо .
SFX Y84 0 тоңмо .
SFX Y84 0 томо .
SFX Y84 0 тоҡмо .
SFX Y84 0 тоғоҙмо .
SFX Y84 0 толармы .
SFX Y84 0 ҡанмынмы .
SFX Y84 0 ҡанһыңмы .
SFX Y84 0 ҡанмы .
SFX Y84 0 ҡанбыҙмы .
SFX Y84 0 ҡанһығыҙмы .
SFX Y84 0 ҡандармы .
SFX Y84 0 ҡайныммы .
SFX Y84 0 ҡайныңмы .
SFX Y84 0 ҡайнымы .
SFX Y84 0 ҡайныҡмы .
SFX Y84 0 ҡайнығыҙмы .
SFX Y84 0 ҡайнылармы .
SFX Y84 0 аммы .
SFX Y84 0 амынмы .
SFX Y84 0 аһыңмы .
SFX Y84 0 амы .
SFX Y84 0 абыҙмы .
SFX Y84 0 аһығыҙмы .
SFX Y84 0 алармы .
SFX Y84 0 асаҡмынмы .
SFX Y84 0 асаҡһыңмы .
SFX Y84 0 асаҡмы .
SFX Y84 0 асаҡбыҙмы .
SFX Y84 0 асаҡһығыҙмы .
SFX Y84 0 асаҡтармы .
SFX Y84 0 айыммы .
SFX Y84 0 айыҡмы .
SFX Y84 0 һаммы .
SFX Y84 0 һаңмы .
SFX Y84 0 һамы .
SFX Y84 0 һаҡмы .
SFX Y84 0 һағыҙмы .
SFX Y84 0 һалармы .
SFX Y84 0 ҡасмы .
SFX Y84 0 ҡансамы .
SFX Y84 0 оусымы .
SFX Y84 0 оумо .
SFX Y84 0 томдор .
SFX Y84 0 тоңдор .
SFX Y84 0 толор .
SFX Y84 0 тоҡтор .
SFX Y84 0 тоғоҙҙор .
SFX Y84 0 толарҙыр .
SFX Y84 0 ҡанмындыр .
SFX Y84 0 ҡанһыңдыр .
SFX Y84 0 ҡандыр .
SFX Y84 0 ҡанбыҙҙыр .
SFX Y84 0 ҡанһығыҙҙыр .
SFX Y84 0 ҡандарҙыр .
SFX Y84 0 ҡайнымдыр .
SFX Y84 0 ҡайныңдыр .
SFX Y84 0 ҡайнылыр .
SFX Y84 0 ҡайныҡтыр .
SFX Y84 0 ҡайнығыҙҙыр .
SFX Y84 0 ҡайныларҙыр .
SFX Y84 0 амдыр .
SFX Y84 0 амындыр .
SFX Y84 0 аһыңдыр .
SFX Y84 0 алыр .
SFX Y84 0 абыҙҙыр .
SFX Y84 0 аһығыҙҙыр .
SFX Y84 0 аларҙыр .
SFX Y84 0 асаҡмындыр .
SFX Y84 0 асаҡһыңдыр .
SFX Y84 0 асаҡтыр .
SFX Y84 0 асаҡбыҙҙыр .
SFX Y84 0 асаҡһығыҙҙыр .
SFX Y84 0 асаҡтарҙыр .
SFX Y84 0 оусылыр .
SFX Y84 0 оуҙор .
SFX Y84 0 томсо .
SFX Y84 0 тоңсо .
SFX Y84 0 тосо .
SFX Y84 0 тоҡсо .
SFX Y84 0 тоғоҙсо .
SFX Y84 0 толарсы .
SFX Y84 0 ҡанмынсы .
SFX Y84 0 ҡанһыңсы .
SFX Y84 0 ҡансы .
SFX Y84 0 ҡанбыҙсы .
SFX Y84 0 ҡанһығыҙсы .
SFX Y84 0 ҡандарсы .
SFX Y84 0 ҡайнымсы .
SFX Y84 0 ҡайныңсы .
SFX Y84 0 ҡайнысы .
SFX Y84 0 ҡайныҡсы .
SFX Y84 0 ҡайнығыҙсы .
SFX Y84 0 ҡайныларсы .
SFX Y84 0 амсы .
SFX Y84 0 амынсы .
SFX Y84 0 аһыңсы .
SFX Y84 0 асы .
SFX Y84 0 абыҙсы .
SFX Y84 0 аһығыҙсы .
SFX Y84 0 аларсы .
SFX Y84 0 асаҡмынсы .
SFX Y84 0 асаҡһыңсы .
SFX Y84 0 асаҡсы .
SFX Y84 0 асаҡбыҙсы .
SFX Y84 0 асаҡһығыҙсы .
SFX Y84 0 асаҡтарсы .
SFX Y84 0 һонсо .
SFX Y84 0 оғоҙсо .
SFX Y84 0 һондарсы .
SFX Y84 0 айымсы .
SFX Y84 0 айыҡсы .
SFX Y84 0 һамсы .
SFX Y84 0 һаңсы .
SFX Y84 0 һасы .
SFX Y84 0 һаҡсы .
SFX Y84 0 һағыҙсы .
SFX Y84 0 һаларсы .

SFX Y85 Y 4 # V15 indc
SFX Y85 0 мо .	+Q
SFX Y85 0 со .	+Clt/сы
SFX Y85 0 тор .	+Indf
SFX Y85 0 молор .	+Q+Indf

SFX Y86 Y 2 # V15 opt
SFX Y86 0 мо .	+Q
SFX Y86 0 со .	+Clt/сы

SFX Y87 Y 2 # V15 cond
SFX Y87 0 мо .	+Q
SFX Y87 0 со .	+Clt/сы

SFX Y88 Y 4 # V15 gna
SFX Y88 0 мо .	+Q
SFX Y88 0 со .	+Clt/сы
SFX Y88 0 тор .	+Indf
SFX Y88 0 молор .	+Q+Indf

SFX Y89 Y 3 # V15 gpr_pot
SFX Y89 0 мо .	+Q
SFX Y89 0 тор .	+Indf
SFX Y89 0 молор .	+Q+Indf

SFX Y90 Y 3 # V15 ger
SFX Y90 0 мо .	+Q
SFX Y90 0 тор .	+Indf
SFX Y90 0 молор .	+Q+Indf

SFX Y91 Y 1 # V15 imp
SFX Y91 0 со .	+Clt/сы

SFX Y92 Y 3 # V15 fut
SFX Y92 0 мо .	+Q
SFX Y92 0 тор .	+Indf
SFX Y92 0 со .	+Clt/сы

SFX Y93 Y 2 # V15 opt
SFX Y93 0 мо .	+Q
SFX Y93 0 тор .	+Indf

SFX Y94 Y 2 # V15 plan
SFX Y94 0 мо .	+Q
SFX Y94 0 тор .	+Indf

SFX Y95 Y 3 # V15 gna_perf
SFX Y95 0 мо .	+Q
SFX Y95 0 тор .	+Indf
SFX Y95 0 со .	+Clt/сы

SFX Y96 Y 3 # V15 inf
SFX Y96 0 мо .	+Q
SFX Y96 0 тор .	+Indf
SFX Y96 0 со .	+Clt/сы

SFX Z01 Y 1 # звукоподражательное слово Descr
SFX Z01 0 0 .	[Descr]

SFX Z02 Y 1 # звательное слово
SFX Z02 0 0 .

SFX Z03 Y 1 # вводное слово
SFX Z03 0 0 .

SFX Z04 Y 1 # модальное слово
SFX Z04 0 0 .	[Mod]

SFX Z05 Y 1 # предлог
SFX Z05 0 0 .

SFX Z06 Y 1 # в функции вспомагатеьного глагола
SFX Z06 0 0 .
